Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 11. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.20.705.
[Renumbered as AS 10.20.905.]

Sec. 10.20.710.
[Renumbered as AS 10.20.910.]

Sec. 10.20.715.
[Renumbered as AS 10.20.915.]

Sec. 10.20.720.
[Renumbered as AS 10.20.920.]

Sec. 10.20.725.
[Renumbered as AS 10.20.925.]

Sec. 10.20.905.
Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power and authority reasonably necessary for administering this chapter efficiently and performing the duties imposed by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.20.705

. Renumbered in 2012.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.20.910.
Applicability to domestic and foreign corporations.

The provisions of this chapter relating to domestic corporations apply to all corporations organized under this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter relating to foreign corporations apply to all foreign nonprofit corporations conducting affairs in this state for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 10 ch 94 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.20.710

.
Renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 10.20.915.
Application to foreign and interstate commerce.

This chapter applies to commerce with foreign nations and among the several states only as permitted under the Constitution of the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.20.715

. Renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 10.20.920.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“articles of incorporation” means the original or restated articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation and all amendments to them, including articles of merger;

“board of directors” means the group of persons vested with the management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name by which the group is designated;

“bylaws” means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which the rules are designated;

“commissioner” means commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter, except a foreign corporation;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“foreign corporation” means a nonprofit corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state;

“member” means one having membership rights in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws;

“nonprofit corporation” means a corporation no part of the income or profit of which is distributed to its members, directors, or officers.

“remote communication” has the meaning given in AS

10.06.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 71 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 28 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.20.720

.
Renumbered in 2012.
The paragraphs were reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.
In 2012, the definition of “insolvent”, which was formerly paragraph (8) of this section, was renumbered as
AS

10.20.365(b)

and paragraphs (9) and (10) were renumbered as (8) and (9), respectively.

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that the 2021 enactment of (10) of this section does not affect a court action or court proceeding begun or a right accrued before April 1, 2021, see sec. 29, ch. 1, SLA 2021, in the 2021, Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, added (10).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 enactment of (10) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.20.925.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Nonprofit Corporation Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.20.725

. Renumbered in 2012.